Washington statutes.
RCW 42.52.8024

Exemption—Rosa Franklin legislative internship program scholarship.

This chapter does not prohibit the secretary of the senate, the chief clerk of the house of representatives, or their designee from soliciting and accepting contributions to the Rosa Franklin legislative internship program scholarship account created in RCW 44.04.410. Furthermore, this chapter does not prohibit any legislative member or legislative employee from soliciting gifts for the Rosa Franklin legislative internship program scholarship account.

[ 2021 c 108 s 4.]